District of Columbia statutes.
8-153.01

Coal tar limitations.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “coal tar pavement product” means a material that contains coal tar and is for use on an asphalt or concrete surface, including a driveway or parking lot.

(b)

No person shall sell, offer for sale, use, or permit to be used on property he or she owns, a coal tar pavement product.

(c)

(1)

Any person who violates this section shall be liable to the District for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $ 2,500 for each violation.

(2)

For any violation, each day of the violation shall constitute a separate offense and the penalties prescribed shall apply separately to each offense.

(3)

Adjudication of any infraction of this section shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

(d)

This section shall apply as of July 1, 2009.

History

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 181
as added Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-371, § 2(c), 56 DCR 1353
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 149(b), 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “permit to be used on property” for “permit to be used, on property” in (b).